District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-301.01

Purpose.

Repealed.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 790, ch. 736, § 2
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 232(a), 50 DCR 5668
1981 Ed., § 5-801.
1973 Ed., § 5-701.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
Short title of subtitle D of title II of Law 15-39: Section 231 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that subtitle D of title II of the act may be cited as the Redevelopment Act Amendments Act of 2003.
Transfer of powers, duties, and responsibilities from Board of Directors of Redevelopment Land Agency: Section 30(a) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided for the transfer of the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Board of Directors of the Redevelopment Land Agency to the Board of Directors of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation, and for the abolition of the Board of Directors of the Redevelopment Land Agency.